incubator/apertium-yid/apertium-yid.yid.twol
Alphabet
 ·ּ ־ א אַ אָ ב בֿ ג ד ה ו וּ ז ח חּ ט י יִ ך כ כּ ל ם מ ן נ ס ע ף פ פּ פֿ ץ צ ק ר ש שׂ ת תּ װ ױ ײ ײַ ׳ ״
 %{ь%}:0 %>:0  ;

Sets

Vowel = א אַ אָ יִ י ו וּ ע ױ ײ ײַ ;

Cons = ב בֿ ג ד ה ז ח חּ ט י ך כ כּ ל ם מ ן נ ס ף פ פּ פֿ ץ צ ק ר ש שׂ ת תּ װ ;

Rules 

"Remove suffix vowel with vowel-ending stem"
i:0 <=> Vow %{VSUF%}:0 _ [ m | n ] ;

! Resources:
! http://wiki.apertium.org/wiki/Starting_a_new_language_with_HFST#Enter_twol
! https://kitwiki.csc.fi/twiki/bin/view/KitWiki/HfstHome
! http://hfst.sourceforge.net/
! http://wiki.apertium.org/wiki/Twol
! http://wiki.apertium.org/wiki/Hfst

!!!!!!!! UMLAUT RULES !!!!!!!!

"Main vowel umlaut rule, for plural forms"
Vx:Vy <=> _ :Cons* %>: %{ь%}:0 ;
      where
          Vx in ( א אַ אָ יִ י ו וּ ע ױ ײ ײַ )
          Vy in ( ע ע ע יִ י י י ע ײַ ײ ײַ )
          !!! FIXME: ױ sometimes → ײ
      matched ;
